Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 69. Health Services

§ 2601.
Aid to hospitals.

At any legal meeting thereof, a town or incorporated village may appropriate such sums of money as it deems necessary for the erection, equipment, or support of any nonsectarian hospital established within the county where such town is located, or in an adjoining county, or in an adjoining county in another state.

§ 2602.
Free hospital beds.

A town may appropriate such sums of money, not exceeding $700.00, for a free hospital bed or beds for a period of not less than one year and may appropriate such sum of money, not exceeding $5,000.00, for the permanent endowment of a free hospital bed or beds, as such town or city deems advisable, for the use of the inhabitants of such municipality as are entitled to receive assistance by reason of their indigent circumstances.

§ 2603.
Contract with hospital.

The treasurer of a municipality making an appropriation, as provided in section 2602 of this title, may make a contract with such hospital concerning the admission of patients thereto.
The rate, rules, and regulations governing such admission shall be approved by the selectboard of such town or the city council of such city before a payment is made to such hospital.

§ 2604.
Joint action by municipalities.

A municipality may appropriate a sum of money to secure a licensed physician or a registered nurse, or both, or provide ambulance service, and may join with adjacent municipalities in providing these services.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 327

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 2605.
Physician’s residence—Purchase.

Municipalities, separately or by compact, may purchase and maintain a residence for a physician, and may contract with the physician for his or her occupancy on a lease-purchase option basis, upon approval of the question and the money therefor, by vote at a regular or special meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

HISTORY:

1967, No. 152

, § 1, eff. April 15, 1967.

§ 2606.
Physician’s residence; financing.

Municipalities and compacts may borrow the money so voted upon notes signed by the treasurer of the municipality or compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 152

, § 2, eff. April 15, 1967; amended

2017, No. 74

, § 101.

§ 2607.
Appropriation for traveling nurse.

Towns, incorporated villages, and incorporated school districts may appropriate a sum for the purpose of employing a registered nurse within such municipality or may join with other adjoining municipalities in employing a registered nurse.
The provisions of this section shall not apply to municipal corporations whose charters make provisions for the employment of school, district, or traveling nurses.

§ 2608.
Appropriations for hospitals; cities may make.

When the charter of a city provides that a board or body, other than the legal voters in city meeting assembled, may assess taxes and appropriate money, such board or body may assess taxes and appropriate such sums of money as it deems necessary for the support of a nonsectarian hospital established in such city and incorporated and existing under and by virtue of the laws of the State.